California statutes. Education Code
If the university is able to reduce annual debt service costs by refunding, defeasing, or retiring general obligation bonds or State Public Works Board lease revenue bonds, as described in Section 92493, the university shall annually contribute an equal amount to reduce the existing unfunded liability of the University of California Retirement Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 50, Sec. 10.   (AB 94)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Indentures [92510. - 92533.]

92510.

The regents may enter into indentures providing for the aggregate principal amount, date or dates, maturities, interest rates, denominations, form, registration, transfer, and interchange of any revenue bonds and coupons issued pursuant to this chapter, and the terms and conditions on which the bonds shall be executed, issued, secured, sold, paid, redeemed, funded, and refunded. Reference on the face of the bonds to such indenture by its date of adoption, or the apparent date on the face thereof, is sufficient to incorporate all of the provisions of the indenture and of this chapter into the body of the bonds and their appurtenant coupons. Each taker and subsequent holder of the bonds or coupons, whether the coupons are attached to, or detached from, the bonds, has recourse to all of the provisions of the indentures and of this chapter, and is bound thereby.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92511.

An indenture pursuant to which bonds are issued may include any and all such convenants and agreements on the part of the regents as the regents deems necessary or advisable for the better security of the bonds issued pursuant to the indenture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92512.

An indenture shall provide the means by which payments of principal and interest of bonds shall be secured.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92513.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued pursuant to the indenture requiring the regents to pay or cause to be paid punctually the principal of all such bonds and the interest on such bonds on the date or dates, or at the place or places, and in the manner mentioned in such bonds and in the coupons appertaining to the bonds in accordance with such indenture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92514.

The regents may include in an indenture such limitations as to competitive projects, both as to location and comparative rentals, as may be deemed necessary or desirable for the security of revenue bonds issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92515.

The regents may also include in an indenture a covenant that no project acquired, constructed, or completed from the proceeds of revenue bonds issued by the regents shall be used without charge for such use or that no facilities of any such project shall be furnished free of charge to any person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92516.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued pursuant to the indenture, requiring the regents to operate the project continuously, to the extent practicable under conditions as they may from time to time exist, in an efficient and economical manner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92517.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued pursuant to the indentures requiring the regents to make all necessary repairs, renewals, and replacements to any project, and to keep the project at all times in good repair, working order, and condition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92518.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued pursuant to the indenture requiring the regents to preserve and protect the security of the bonds and the rights of the holders of the bonds and to warrant and defend such rights.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92519.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued pursuant to the indenture requiring the regents to pay and discharge, or cause to be paid and discharged, all lawful claims for labor, materials, and supplies or other charges which, if unpaid, might become a lien or charge upon the revenues, or any part of the revenues, of any project acquired, constructed, or completed from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds, or upon any physicial properties, or which might impair the security of the bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92520.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued pursuant to the indenture which limits, restricts, or prohibits any right, power, or privilege of the regents to mortgage or otherwise encumber, sell, lease, or dispose of any improvements constructed from the proceeds of the bonds, or to enter into any lease or agreement which impairs or impedes the operation of a project, or any part of a project, necessary to secure adequate revenues or which otherwise impairs or impedes the rights of the holders of the bonds with respect to such revenues.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92521.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued pursuant to the indenture requiring the regents to fix, prescribe, and collect rates, rentals, or other charges in connection with the services and facilities furnished from the project acquired, constructed, or purchased from part or all of the proceeds of the bonds, sufficient to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as they become due and payable, together with such additional sums as may be required for any sinking fund, reserve fund, or other special fund provided for the further security of such bonds or as a depreciation charge or other charges in connection with such project.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92522.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued pursuant to the indenture requiring the regents to hold, or cause to be held, in trust the revenues, or any part of revenues, pledged to the payment of such bonds and the interest on such bonds, or to any reserve or other fund created for the further protection of the bonds, and to apply such revenues, or part of revenues, or cause them to be applied only as provided in the indenture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92523.

An indenture may include a clause defining the power of the regents in applying the proceeds of the sale of any issue of bonds for the acquiring, constructing, or completing of any project or any part of any project.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92524.

An indenture may include a clause limiting the power of the regents to issue additional bonds for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, or completing any project or any part of any project.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92525.

An indenture may include a clause requiring, specifying, or limiting the kind, amount, and character of insurance to be maintained by the regents on any project, or any part of any project, and the use and disposition of the proceeds of any such insurance thereafter collected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92526.

An indenture may include a clause providing the events of default and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of the bonds of the regents then or thereafter issued may become or be declared due and payable prior to maturity, and the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92527.

An indenture may include a clause designating the rights, limitations, powers, and duties arising upon breach by the regents of any of the covenants, conditions, or obligations contained in any indenture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92528.

An indenture may include a clause prescribing procedure by which the terms and conditions of the indenture may be subsequently amended or modified with the consent of the regents and the vote or written assent of the holders of a specified principal amount or specified proportion of the bonds issued and outstanding. Such clause may provide for meetings of bondholders and for the manner in which the consent of the bondholders may be given. The clause shall specifically state the effect of such amendment or modification upon the rights of the holders of all of the bonds and interest coupons appertaining to the bonds, whether attached to the bonds or detached from the bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92529.

With respect to any clause providing for the modification or amendment of an indenture, the regents may agree that bonds held by the regents or by the state or any political subdivision of the state, including any public corporation, board, or agency of any class or kind, shall not be counted as outstanding bonds, or be entitled to vote or assent, but shall, nevertheless, be subject to any such modification or amendment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92530.

An indenture may include a clause or clauses providing for such other acts and matters as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order better to secure the bonds or to make the bonds more marketable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92531.

The regents may provide in an indenture that the proceeds from the sale of all revenue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter shall be paid directly to any bank or trust company designated by the regents as the fiscal agent or depositary of the regents, to be held in a separate account to be designated the “construction fund” and to be disbursed in the manner and upon the conditions provided in the indenture for any of the following:

(a) The acquisition, construction, and completion of the project, including the payment of the cost of all surveys, preparation of plans and specifications, and the payment of all architectural, engineering, legal, and administrative costs.

(b) The payment of all costs and expenses of, and incident to, the issuance and sale of bonds.

(c) The payment of interest due, or to become due, on the bonds during the period of actual construction, and for such further period as may be specified in the indenture for the issuance of the bonds not exceeding two years after the period of construction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92532.

Moneys in any construction fund may be invested as the regents in its sole discretion shall determine, subject only to such limitations as may be provided in an indenture providing for the issuance of revenue bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92533.

After all the revenue bonds shall have been fully paid and discharged, or provision for their payment and discharge irrevocably made, any surplus moneys in the construction fund shall, subject to the limitations and restrictions in any indenture providing for the issuance of the revenue bonds, become and be the property of the regents, and be used by the regents for any lawful purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Funding or Refunding Bonds [92570. - 92571.]

92570.

The regents may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds for the purpose of redeeming or retiring any revenue bonds issued by the regents. All provisions of this chapter applicable to the issuance of revenue bonds are applicable to the funding or refunding bonds and to the issuance, sale, or exchange of funding or refunding bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92571.

Funding or refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to provide funds for the payment of all bonds to be funded or refunded by such funding or refunding bonds, and in addition for the payment of all expenses incident to the calling, retiring, or paying of such outstanding bonds, and the issuance of such funding or refunding bonds. These expenses include the difference in amount between the par value of the funding or refunding bonds and any amount less than par for which the funding or refunding bonds are sold, any amount necessary to be made available for the payment of interest upon such funding or refunding bonds from the date of sale of the funding or refunding bonds to the date of payment of the bonds to be funded or refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be funded or refunded will be paid pursuant to the call of the bonds to be funded or refunded or agreement with the holders of the bonds to be funded or refunded, and the premium, if any, necessary to be paid in order to call or retire the outstanding bonds and the interest accruing on the outstanding bonds to the date of the call or retirement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Miscellaneous Provisions [92600. - 92689.]



  ARTICLE 1. University of California Police [92600. - 92601.]

92600.

The Regents of the University of California are authorized and empowered to appoint one or more persons to be members of the University of California police department as such police department is constituted on September 19, 1947, or may thereafter be constituted. Persons employed and compensated as members of said police department, when so appointed and duly sworn, are peace officers; provided, that such officers shall not exercise their powers or authority except (a) upon the campuses of the University of California and an area within one mile of the exterior boundaries of each thereof, (b) in or about other grounds or properties owned, operated, controlled or administered by the Regents of the University of California, and (c) as provided in Section 830.2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92601.

Every member of the University of California police department shall be supplied with, and authorized to wear, a badge bearing the words “University of California Police.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.3. Office of the Chief Investment Officer [92603. - 92603.]

92603.

(a) The regents are urged to direct their Office of the Chief Investment Officer (OCIO) to do all of the following:

(1) Use
 reasonable efforts to encourage diversity, such as implementing a hiring strategy that requires that candidates from underrepresented groups be given full consideration whenever an OCIO position is to be filled.

(2) Request partner firms it invests in use
 reasonable efforts to encourage diversity, such as implementing a hiring strategy that requires that candidates from underrepresented groups be given full consideration whenever a position is filled.

(3) Launch an emerging manager program. The OCIO shall define the term “emerging manager” for the purpose of this section.

(4) Encourage startup firms to increase efforts to develop diverse executive teams and to recruit diverse managerial talent, as applicable.

(b) The OCIO shall submit a report to the chairs of the appropriate policy committees of each house of the Legislature, on or before January 1, 2020, describing its progress 
 addressing the requirements of the regents set forth in subdivision (a). The report shall also include pertinent statistics setting forth the OCIO’s internal diversity metrics. The report required by this section shall comply with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) Nothing in
 this section shall require the regents or the OCIO to take action that is inconsistent with its fiduciary duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 912, Sec. 2.   (AB 2041)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Charles R. Drew/UCLA Undergraduate Medical Education Program [92605. - 92605.]

92605.

(a) The regents are hereby requested to consider, as a component of the University of California’s current systemwide medical education program assessment, the expansion of the Charles R. Drew/UCLA Undergraduate Medical Education Program.

(b) The regents are further requested to submit, not later than June 30, 2003, a report summarizing their findings regarding the Charles R. Drew/UCLA Undergraduate Medical Education Program to the Governor, the Legislature, and the California Postsecondary Education Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1140, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Employees [92611. - 92612.3.]

92611.

The minimum and maximum salary limits for laborers, workmen, and mechanics employed on an hourly or per diem basis need not be uniform throughout the state, but the regents shall ascertain, as to each such position, the general prevailing rate of such wages in the various localities of the state.

In fixing such minimum and maximum salary limits within the various localities of the state, the regents shall take into account the prevailing rates of wages in the localities in which the employee is to work and other relevant factors, and shall not fix the minimum salary limits below the general prevailing rate so ascertained for the various localities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92611.5.

(a) If the Regents of the University of California adopt the provisions of this section, by appropriate resolution, and subject to subdivision (c), the regents shall grant to an employee, who has exhausted all available sick leave, the following leaves of absence with pay:

(1) A leave of absence, not exceeding 30 days in a one-year period, to an employee who is an organ donor, for the purpose of donating the employee’s organ to another person.

(2) A leave of absence, not exceeding five days in a one-year period, to an employee who is a bone marrow donor, for the purpose of donating the employee’s bone marrow to another person.

(b) If the Regents of the University of California adopt the provisions of this section, by appropriate resolution, and subject to subdivision (c), the regents shall grant an additional unpaid leave of absence, not exceeding 30 business days in a one-year period, to an employee who has exhausted all available sick leave and is an organ donor, for the purpose of donating the employee’s organ to another person.

(c) To receive a leave of absence pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), an employee shall provide written verification to the regents that the employee is an organ or bone marrow donor and that there is a medical necessity for the donation of the organ or bone marrow.

(d) Any period of time during which an employee is required to be absent from the employee’s position by reason of being an organ or bone marrow donor
 is not a break in the employee’s continuous service for the purpose of the employee’s right to salary adjustments, sick leave, vacation, annual leave, or seniority.

(e) If an employee is unable to return to work beyond the time or period that the employee is granted leave pursuant to this section, the employee shall be paid any vacation balance, annual leave balance, or accumulated compensable overtime. The payment shall be computed by projecting the accumulated time on a calendar basis as though the employee was taking time off. If, during the period of projection, the employee is able to return to work, the employee shall be returned to the employee’s former position.

(f) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government
 Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that, if those provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 316, Sec. 2.   (AB 1223)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

92611.7.

(a) The regents are urged to offer, on at least a semiannual basis, to each of the university’s filers, an orientation course on the relevant ethics statutes and regulations that govern the official conduct of university officials.

(b) As used in this section, “filer” means each member, officer, or designated employee of the University of California, including a regent, who, because of his or her affiliation with the university or any subdivision or campus thereof, is required to file a statement of economic interests in accordance with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 87100) of Title 9 of the Government Code.

(c) The regents shall maintain records indicating the specific attendees, each attendee’s job title, and dates of their attendance for each orientation course offered pursuant to this section. These records shall be maintained for a period of at least five years after each course is offered. These records shall be public records subject to inspection and copying in accordance with Section 81008 of the Government Code and any other public records disclosure laws that are applicable to the university.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), each filer shall attend the orientation course established pursuant to subdivision (a) in accordance with both of the following:

(1) For a person who, as of January 1, 2005, is a filer, as defined in subdivision (b), not later than December 31, 2005, and thereafter, at least once during each consecutive period of two calendar
 years commencing on January 1, 2007.

(2) For a person who becomes a filer, as defined in subdivision (b), after January 1, 2005, within six months after he or she becomes a filer, and at least once during each consecutive period of two calendar years commencing on January 1 of the first odd-numbered year thereafter.

(e) The requirements of subdivision (d) do not apply to a filer, as defined in subdivision (b), who has taken an ethics orientation course through another state agency or the Legislature within the periods set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d) if, in the determination of the regents, that course covered substantially the same material as the course the university would offer to the filer pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 138.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

92611.9.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California carefully monitor the use and effects of the contracting of services at newly developed facilities. In order to assist in an improved understanding of such impacts, the university is requested to report annually to the fiscal committees of the Legislature, on or before January 15 of each year, the extent to which it has chosen to contract for services, the rationale for those decisions, the cost implications of those decisions, the impact on hiring, and the extent to which the hiring and contracting practices are at variance with the practices at existing facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 386, Sec. 19.   (AB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

92612.

(a) Every individual shall have the right of access to all personal information, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1798.3 of the Civil Code, contained in any employee record that is maintained by the University of California that pertains to the individual.

(b) If information relating to the employment, advancement, renewal of appointment, or promotion of any individual in an academic senate position is received with the promise or understanding that the identity of the source of the information would be held in confidence, the university shall provide a copy of the text of that information to the individual to whom the information pertains with only the deletion of the name and affiliation, if any, of the source. “Information,” as used in this subdivision, shall be limited to letters of recommendation, and reports of faculty review committees compiled for the purpose of determining the qualifications of members of the academic senate for employment, advancement, renewal of appointment, or promotion.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not apply to any personal information, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1798.3 of the Civil Code, received prior to January 1, 1979, with the promise or understanding that the identity of the source of the personal information would be held in confidence.

(d) Subdivisions (b) and (c) shall not be applicable to the University of California unless adopted by the regents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 47.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

92612.1.

(a) The regents are requested, as part of the hiring process for an applicant applying for an academic, athletic, or administrative position with the University of California, to do both of the following:

(1) Require
 an applicant to disclose any final administrative decision or final judicial decision issued within the last seven years from the date of submission of the application determining that the applicant committed misconduct, including sexual harassment.

(2) Permit applicants to disclose if they have filed an appeal with the previous
 employer, administrative agency, or court, if applicable.

(b) The University of California is requested to not ask an applicant to disclose, orally or in writing, information concerning any final administrative decision or final judicial decision described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), including any inquiry about an applicable decision on any employment application, until the University of California has determined that the applicant meets the minimum employment qualifications stated in the notice issued for the position.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Final administrative decision” means the written determination of
 whether or not sexual harassment occurred as determined by the decisionmaker following the final investigative report and a hearing, if a hearing is either required pursuant to Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) or federal regulations implementing those provisions, or is required by the public postsecondary educational institution’s written policy on sex discrimination, including sexual harassment, and related grievance processes. If a party has filed a timely grievance or appeal, “final administrative decision” means after the grievance or appeal decision has been issued.

(2) “Final judicial decision” means a final determination of a matter submitted to a court that is recorded in a judgment or order of that court.

(3) “Misconduct” means any violation of the policies governing employee conduct at the applicant’s previous place of employment, including, but not limited to, violations of policies prohibiting sexual harassment, sexual assault, or other forms of harassment or discrimination, as defined by
 the employer.

(4) “Sexual harassment” has the same meaning as described in subdivision (a) of Section 66262.5 or, if applicable, as defined by the federal regulations implementing Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 415, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 673, Sec. 6.   (AB 810)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

92612.2.

(a) The regents are requested, as part of the hiring process for an applicant applying for a position with the University of California, to do both of the following:

(1) Require an applicant to sign a release form that authorizes, in the event the applicant reaches the final stages of the application process, the release of information by the applicant’s previous employers to the campus of the University of California concerning any substantiated allegations of misconduct in order to permit the campus to evaluate the released information with respect to the criteria for a potential job placement.

(2) If an applicant reaches the final stages of the application process for the
 intended position, require campuses of the University of California to use the release form signed pursuant to paragraph (1) to engage in a reasonable attempt to obtain information from the previous employer concerning any substantiated allegations of misconduct.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the regents apply all provisions of this section to all persons who apply for an academic or athletic position with the University of California.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Applicant” means a person who submits an employment application for an intended tenure-track faculty position, tenured faculty position, athletic head coach position, athletic assistant coach position, athletic trainer position, or supervising athletic trainer position, but does not include a
 person who is a current employee and is hired or rehired for a different position with the same campus.

(2) “Misconduct” means any violation of the policies governing employee conduct at the applicant’s previous place of employment, including, but not limited to, violations of policies prohibiting sexual harassment, sexual assault, or other forms of harassment or discrimination, as defined by the employer.

(3) “Substantiated allegation” means an allegation that has been sustained based upon a burden of proof of at least a preponderance of the evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 673, Sec. 7.   (AB 810)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

92612.3.

(a) The University of California may require background checks, to be completed by the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (b), during the final stages of the recruitment process for a prospective staff employee, contractor, or volunteer.

(b) (1) The University of California shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images of a prospective staff employee, contractor, or volunteer, that the University of California obtains pursuant to subdivision (a), and related information required by the Department of Justice, for purposes of a state- and federal-level criminal history background check in accordance with subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(2) The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal response, or both if applicable, to the University of California pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(c) This section does not authorize hiring practices that are inconsistent with the requirements of Section 12952 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 27.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Retirement Plan for Employees Excluded from theUniversity of California Retirement System [92613. - 92614.]

92613.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that this section is intended to satisfy the requirements prescribed by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1990 (OBRA). Section 3121(b)(7)(F) of the Internal Revenue Code requires that employees of the University of California must be covered by social security, or, in the alternative, be provided benefits through a qualified pension plan or annuity program. Therefore, to facilitate compliance with these requirements, the Legislature hereby encourages and empowers the Regents of the University of California to take all steps necessary to implement a qualified defined contribution plan for their employees, and to that end to withhold as deferred compensation from the wages otherwise payable to those employees up to 7.5 percent of wages, as the term “wages” is defined for social security purposes, or the other amount as may be required as an alternative to social security contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 986, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

92614.

The provisions of Section 92613 shall supersede Sections 3560 to 3599, inclusive, of the Government Code and any memorandum of understanding entered into pursuant to those sections, for any employees hired or rehired on or after the effective date of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 986, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Economic Legacy of Slavery in California [92615. - 92615.]

92615.

(a) The Legislature requests that the Regents of the University of California assemble a colloquium of scholars to draft a research proposal to analyze the economic benefits of slavery that accrued to owners and the businesses, including insurance companies and their subsidiaries, that received those benefits. The colloquium shall draw on the resources and knowledge of historians and other scholars from across the nation as well as California, and interested parties shall also be invited to participate.

(b) As resources allow, the State Library shall participate in the effort required by this section. The State Library shall examine the economic legacy of slavery in California, including forced slavery, chattel slavery, and indentured servitude.

(c) The Legislature further requests that the Regents of the University of California make recommendations to the Legislature regarding the colloquium’s findings on or before January 1, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1038, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.9. California Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act Compliance [92618. - 92618.]

92618.

(a) As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Act” means the California Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act of 2001 established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 8010) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Institution” means a campus of the University of California.

(b) On or before June 30, 2024, and annually thereafter, the University of California is strongly
 urged to report each institution’s progress towards completing repatriation pursuant to the act.

(c) The office of the President of the University of California is strongly urged to provide available funding to sufficiently support each institution’s efforts towards completing repatriation pursuant to the act.

(d) The University of California is strongly urged to prohibit use of any Native American human remains or cultural items for purposes of teaching or research at the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 639, Sec. 1.   (AB 226)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Employment of Women [92620. - 92620.]

92620.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Regents of the University of California shall eliminate all policies that detrimentally and unreasonably affect the employment status of females hired by the university.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 278.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Cardcheck Agreements [92625. - 92625.9.]

92625.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In the course of fulfilling its educational mission, the University of California is required to participate in the marketplace, both as a purchaser of goods and services and as a provider of services to its customers, such as students who contract with the university for room and board and medical consumers who utilize the university’s hospitals and clinics. In that role, the university also functions as a proprietor of real property and other physical assets located at its campuses and medical facilities.

(b) In the marketplace, the university must make prudent business decisions, as does any private business entity, to ensure efficient and cost-effective management of its business concerns, and to maximize benefit and minimize risk. One of those risks is the possibility of labor-management conflict arising out of labor union organizing campaigns. This conflict can adversely affect the university’s operation of facilities in which it has a proprietary business interest by causing an interruption in service.

(c) A major potential source of labor-management conflict that threatens the economic interests of the university as a participant in the marketplace is the possibility of economic action taken by labor unions against employers when labor unions seek to organize their workers over employer opposition to unionization. Experience has demonstrated that organizing drives pursuant to formal and adversarial union certification processes often deteriorate into protracted and acrimonious labor-management conflicts.

(d) One way to reduce risk where the university has a proprietary interest in the operation of its facilities is to require, as a condition of the university’s entering into a lease or service contract, that employers operating in the facility agree to a lawful, nonconfrontational alternative process for resolving a union organizing campaign. That alternative process is a so-called “cardcheck,” wherein employee preference regarding whether or not to be represented by a labor union to act as their exclusive collective bargaining representative is determined based on signed authorization cards. Private employers are authorized under existing federal law to agree voluntarily to use this procedure in lieu of election procedures under the supervision of the National Labor Relations Board.

(e) The sole purpose of this article is to protect the university’s proprietary interest in the operation of its facilities and to assume the university’s ability to procure and provide uninterrupted services in the marketplace. This article is not enacted to favor any particular outcome in the determination of employee preference regarding union representation, nor to skew the procedures in that determination to favor or hinder any party to the determination. Likewise, this article is not intended to enact or express any generally applicable policy regarding labor-management relations, or to regulate those relations in any way, but is intended only to protect the university’s proprietary interest as a participant in the marketplace.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

92625.1.

As used in this article:
